Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB193.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.786 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Academic term" means the fall or spring academic semester;
(b) "Academic year" means July 1 through June 30 of each year;
(c) "Approved dual credit course" means a dual credit course developed in accordance with KRS 164.098
and shall include:
1. General education courses that meet the criteria outlined in the statewide general education
core approved by the Council on Postsecondary Education; and
2. Career and technical education courses within a career pathway approved by the Kentucky
Department of Education that leads to an industry-recognized credential;
(d) "Authority" means the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority;
(e) "Dual credit" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.007;
(f) "Dual credit tuition rate ceiling" means one-third (1/3) of the per credit hour tuition amount, rounded
down to the nearest whole dollar, charged by the Kentucky Community and Technical College System
for in-state students;
(g) "Eligible high school student" means a student who:
1. Is a Kentucky resident;
2. Is enrolled in a Kentucky high school[ as a senior or junior];
3. Has completed a thirty (30) minute college success counseling session; and
4. Is enrolled, or accepted for enrollment, in an approved dual credit course at a participating
institution;
(h) "Participating institution" means a postsecondary institution that:
1. Has an agreement with the authority for the administration of the Dual Credit Scholarship
Program;
2. Charges no more than the dual credit tuition rate ceiling per credit hour, including any additional
fees, for any approved dual credit course it offers to any Kentucky public or nonpublic high
school student;
3. Does not charge any tuition or fees to an eligible high school student for an approved dual credit
course beyond what is paid by the Dual Credit Scholarship Program when the course is not
successfully completed; and
4. Is a:
a. Kentucky Community and Technical College System institution;
b. Four (4) year Kentucky public college or university; or
c. Four (4) year private college or university that is accredited by the Southern Association
of Colleges and Schools and whose main campus is located in Kentucky; and
(i) "Successfully completed" means a student receiving both secondary and postsecondary credit upon
completion of an approved dual credit course.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) To promote dual credit coursework opportunities at no cost to eligible Kentucky high school students, the
General Assembly hereby establishes the Dual Credit Scholarship Program.
(3) In consultation with the Council on Postsecondary Education and the Kentucky Department of Education[
and Labor Cabinet], the authority shall administer the Dual Credit Scholarship Program and shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed for the administration of
the program.
(4) (a) Each high school shall apply to the authority for dual credit scholarship funds for each eligible high
school student.
(b) The authority may award a dual credit scholarship to an eligible high school student for an academic
term on a first-come, first-served basis by application date, to the extent funds are available for that
purpose[, except that a scholarship shall be awarded to an eligible high school senior prior to awarding
an eligible high school junior].
(c) An eligible high school student may receive a dual credit scholarship for a maximum of:
1. Two (2) career and technical education[ successfully completed] dual credit courses per
academic year; and
2. Two (2) general education dual credit courses over the junior and senior year.
(d) The dual credit scholarship award amount shall be equal to the amount charged by a participating
institution, not to exceed the dual credit tuition rate ceiling for each dual credit hour[, except the
scholarship amount shall be reduced by fifty percent (50%) if the dual credit course is not successfully
completed by the student].
(e) Dual credit scholarship funds shall not be used for remedial or developmental coursework.
(5) Each participating institution shall submit information each academic term to the authority required for the
administration of the scholarship as determined by the authority.
(6) [Beginning August 1, 2017, and each year thereafter, ]The authority shall provide an annual[a] report to the
secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet, the president of the Council on Postsecondary Education[,] and
the commissioner of the Kentucky Department of Education to include:
(a) The number of students, by local school district and in total, served by the Dual Credit Scholarship
Program; and
(b) The number of general education and career and technical education dual credits earned by students
by high school and in total.
(7) By May 31 of[, 2019, and] each year[ thereafter], the Kentucky Center for[ Education and Workforce]
Statistics, in collaboration with the authority, shall publish data on the Dual Credit Scholarship Program's
academic and workforce outcomes. The center shall annually provide a report on the data to the Interim Joint
Committee on Education.
(8) (a) The Dual Credit Scholarship Program trust fund is hereby created as a trust fund in the State Treasury
to be administered by the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority for the purpose of
providing scholarships described in this section.
(b) The trust fund shall consist of state general fund appropriations, gifts and grants from public and private
sources, and federal funds.[ All moneys included in the fund shall be appropriated for the purposes set
forth in this section.]
(c) Any unallotted[unalloted] or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested as provided in
KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be credited to the trust fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be
carried forward to the next fiscal year[ and continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in
this section].
Section 2. KRS 164.787 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby establishes the Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship Program to ensure that all
Kentuckians who have not yet earned a postsecondary degree have affordable access to an industry-recognized
certificate, diploma, or associate of applied science degree and, for students with intellectual disabilities

CHAPTER 44 3
enrolled in comprehensive transition and postsecondary programs, affordable access to meaningful credentials
to prepare for competitive integrated employment.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Academic term" means a fall, spring, or summer academic term or other time period specified in an
administrative regulation promulgated by the authority;
(b) "Academic year" means July 1 through June 30 of each year;
(c) ["Approved dual credit course" means a dual credit course developed in accordance with KRS 164.098
that is a career and technical education course within a career pathway approved by the Kentucky
Department of Education that leads to an industry-recognized credential;
(d) "Dual credit tuition rate ceiling" means the same as defined in 164.786;
(e) ]"Eligible institution" means an institution as defined in KRS 164.001 that:
1. Actively participates in the federal Pell Grant program;
2. Executes a contract with the authority on terms the authority deems necessary or appropriate for
the administration of its programs; and
3. [Charges no more than the dual credit tuition rate ceiling per credit hour, including any
additional fees, for any dual credit course it offers to any Kentucky public or nonpublic high
school student; and
4. ]Is a:
a. Kentucky Community and Technical College System institution;
b. Kentucky public university; or
c. College, university, or vocational-technical school that is accredited by a recognized
regional or national accrediting body and licensed to operate at a site in Kentucky;
(d)[(f)] "Eligible program of study" means a program approved by the authority that leads to an industry-
recognized certificate, diploma, or associate of applied science degree in one (1) of Kentucky's top five
(5) high-demand workforce sectors identified by the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board and the
Education and Labor Cabinet or a program of study in a comprehensive transition and postsecondary
program that leads to a credential, certificate, diploma, or degree;
(e)[(g)] "Fees" means mandatory fees charged by an eligible institution for enrollment in a course,
including but not limited to online course fees, lab fees, and administrative fees. "Fees" does not include
tools, books, or other instructional materials that may be required for a course; and
(f)[(h)] "Tuition" means the in-state tuition charged to all students as a condition of enrollment in an
eligible institution.
(3) In consultation with the Education and Labor Cabinet[, the Kentucky Department of Education,] and the
Council on Postsecondary Education, the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority shall administer
the Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship Program and promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed for the administration of the scholarship.
(4) [An eligible high school student shall:
(a) Be a Kentucky resident;
(b) Be enrolled in a Kentucky high school;
(c) Be enrolled, or accepted for enrollment, in an approved dual credit course at an eligible institution; and
(d) Complete and submit a Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship dual credit application to the authority.
(5) ]An eligible workforce student shall:
(a) Be a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;
(b) Be a Kentucky resident as determined by the eligible institution in accordance with criteria established
by the Council on Postsecondary Education for the purposes of admission and tuition assessment;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) 1. Have earned a high school diploma or a High School Equivalency Diploma or be enrolled in a
High School Equivalency Diploma program; or
2. For a student enrolled in a comprehensive transition and postsecondary program, have received
an alternative high school diploma described in KRS 158.140(2)(b) or have attended a Kentucky
public high school and is a student with an intellectual disability as defined in 34 C.F.R. sec.
668.231;
(d) Not have earned an associate's degree or higher level postsecondary degree;
(e) Complete the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for the academic year in which the scholarship
is awarded;
(f) Complete and submit a Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship application to the authority;
(g) Enroll in an eligible program of study at an eligible institution;
(h) Not be enrolled in an ineligible degree program, such as a bachelor or unapproved associate program, at
any postsecondary institution;
(i) Following the first academic term scholarship funds are received, achieve and maintain satisfactory
academic progress as determined by the eligible institution; and
(j) Not be in default on any program under Title IV of the federal act or any obligation to the authority
under any program administered by the authority under KRS 164.740 to 164.7891 or 164.7894, except
that ineligibility for this reason may be waived by the authority for cause.
(5)[(6)] (a) [Beginning with the 2019-2020 academic year, ]The authority shall award a Work Ready
Kentucky Scholarship each academic term to any person who meets the requirements of this section to
the extent funds are available for that purpose.
(b) The scholarship amount awarded to an eligible workforce student for an academic term shall be the
amount remaining after subtracting the student's federal and state grants and scholarships from the
maximum scholarship amount. The maximum scholarship amount shall be the per credit hour in-state
tuition rate at the Kentucky Community and Technical College System multiplied by the number of
credit hours in which the student is enrolled and the fees charged to the student. The authority shall
promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to specify the maximum
amount to be awarded for fees[, except that for the 2019-2020 academic year the amount awarded for
fees shall not exceed four hundred dollars ($400).
(c) The scholarship award for an eligible high school student shall be limited to two (2) approved dual
credit courses per academic year. The scholarship amount awarded shall be equal to the amount charged
by an eligible institution for an approved dual credit course, in accordance with subsection (2)(e)3. of
this section].
(6)[(7)] (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an eligible workforce student's eligibility
for the scholarship shall terminate upon the earlier of:
1. Receiving the scholarship for a total of sixty (60) credit hours; or
2. Obtaining an associate's degree.
(b) For an eligible workforce student enrolled in a comprehensive transition and postsecondary program,
eligibility for the scholarship shall terminate upon the earlier of completing the program or receiving the
scholarship for up to nine (9) academic terms within three (3) academic years.
(7)[(8)] The authority shall annually provide a report on the Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship Program,
prepared in collaboration with the Kentucky Center[Office] for[ Education and Workforce] Statistics, to the
secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet and the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Education that includes, by academic term, academic year, institution, and
workforce sector, the number of:
(a) Students served by the scholarship and the total amount disbursed;
(b) Credits, certificates, diplomas, and associate of applied science degrees earned by students receiving the
scholarship; and

CHAPTER 44 5
(c) Students receiving the scholarship who are enrolled in a comprehensive transition and postsecondary
program and credentials earned by those students.
(8)[(9)] The authority shall report Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship program data to the Kentucky
Center[Office] for[ Education and Workforce] Statistics for analysis of the program's success in meeting the
goal of increasing skilled workforce participation rates.
(9)[(10)] (a) The Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship fund is hereby created as a trust fund in the State
Treasury to be administered by the authority for the purpose of providing scholarships as described in
this section.
(b) The trust fund shall consist of state general fund appropriations, gifts and grants from public and private
sources, and federal funds.[ All moneys included in the fund shall be appropriated for the purposes set
forth in this section.]
(c) Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested as provided in KRS
42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be credited to the trust fund.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be
carried forward to the next fiscal year[ and continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in
this section].
Signed by Governor March 19, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version